Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4729
Commission; cooperate with state agencies.

The commission shall in fulfilling its responsibilities enumerated in section 71-4728 cooperate with any state agency having authority related to the problems of deaf or hard of hearing persons. Such agencies shall also cooperate with the commission. Avoidance of unnecessary duplication of state-delivered services to deaf or hard of hearing persons shall be a primary objective of such cooperation.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 10;

Laws 1981, LB 250, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 22.